Utah statutes.
76-8-806.   Facts kept secret until complaint filed.
A person may not make public any evidence of fact or the name of the person
accused of violating the provisions of Sections 76-8-802, 76-8-803, 76-8-804,
and 76-8-805 prior to the filing of a formal complaint by the prosecuting
attorney or committing magistrate charged with the performance of that duty.
